West Virginia, session 2026, HB5410.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: chapter 8. municipal corporations. article 19. municipal and county waterworks and electric power systems. §8-19-1a. Municipality or county commission to require specialized utility related training. (a) The Legislature finds that municipal and county waterworks provide critical water utility services to West Virginians. Proper oversight by governing bodies and board member training are necessary to ensure financial accountability, regulatory compliance, and operational efficiency.(b) Any municipal governing body or county commission that is operating or has oversight of a waterworks system shall require all board members and senior managers of the municipal or county waterworks systems to complete 12 hours of certified utility management training within six months following appointment or election to their position and obtain six hours of refresher training within six months of re-appointment or re-election, provided by the WV Public Service Commission in collaboration with non-profit organizations, and select state agencies, focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices.The qualifying non-profit organizations shall be a member driven association with at least five years of experience in providing on-site training and technical assistance to small systems.(c) A municipal governing body or county commission that is operating or has oversight of a waterworks system that provides utility management training to their board members and senior managers, focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices, will not be required to participate in formalized training outlined in §8-19-1a(b). ARTICLE 20. COMBINED SYSTEMS. §8-20-1d. Municipality to require specialized utility related training. (a) The Legislature finds that combined municipal waterworks and sewerage systems provide critical utility services to West Virginians. Proper oversight by governing bodies and board member training are necessary to ensure financial accountability, regulatory compliance, and operational efficiency.(b) Any municipal governing body that is operating or has oversight of a combined waterworks and sewerage systems shall require all combined municipal waterworks and sewerage systems board members and senior management to complete 12 hours of certified utility management training within six months following appointment or election to their position and obtain six hours of refresher training within six months of re-appointment or re-election, provided by provided by the provided by the WV Public Service Commission in collaboration with non-profit organizations, and select state agencies. focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices.The qualifying non-profit driven organizations shall be a member driven association with at least five years of experience in providing on-site training and technical assistance to small systems.(c) A municipal governing body that is operating or has oversight of a combined waterworks and sewerage systems that provides utility management training to their board members and senior managers, focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices will not be required to participate in formalized training outlined in §8-20-1a(b). chapter 16. public health. ARTICLE 13. SEWAGE WORKS AND STORMWATER WORKS. §16-13-18b. Municipality to require specialized utility related training. (a) The Legislature finds that municipal sanitary boards provide critical wastewater utility services to West Virginians. Proper oversight by governing bodies and board member training are necessary to ensure financial accountability, regulatory compliance, and operational efficiency.(b)  A municipal governing body that is operating or has oversight of a sanitary sewer system or sanitary board shall require all municipal sanitary board members and senior management to complete 12 hours of certified utility management training within six months following appointment or election to their position and obtain six hours of refresher training within six months of re-appointment or re-election, provided by provided by the WV Public Service Commission in collaboration with non-profit organizations, and select state agencies. focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices.The qualifying non-profit organizations shall be a member driven association with at least five years of experience in providing on-site training and technical assistance to small systems.(c) A municipal governing body that is operating or has oversight of a sanitary sewer system or sanitary board that provides utility management training to their board members and senior managers, focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices will not be required to participate in formalized training outlined in §16-13-18b(b). ARTICLE 13A. PUBLIC SERVICE DISTRICTS. §16-13A-1d. County commission to require specialized utility related training. (a) The Legislature finds that public service districts provide critical utility services to West Virginians, including water and sewer. Proper oversight by governing bodies and board member training are necessary to ensure financial accountability, regulatory compliance, and operational efficiency.(b) Every county commission shall require all board members and senior managers of any public service district whose principal offices are within the county to complete 12 hours of certified utility management training within six months following appointment or election to their position and obtain six hours of refresher training within six months of re-appointment or re-election, provided by the WV Public Service Commission in collaboration with non-profit organizations, and select state agencies. focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices.The qualifying non-profit driven organizations shall be a member driven association with at least five years of experience in providing on-site training and technical assistance to small systems.(c) A County Commission that is operating or has oversight of a waterworks or wastewater system that provides utility management training to their board members and senior managers, focusing on financial management, regulatory compliance, and operational best practices will not be required to participate in formalized training outlined in §16-13A-1d(b).